tr: Kılıf özellikleri: Sırt çantası askıları; Dış aksesuar cebi; Sert köpük astar; İç bölmeler; Kilitlenebilir; İsimlik/kimlik penceresi; Dolgulu iç kısım; Güçlendirilmiş köşeler; Omuz askısı dahil; İstiflenebilir tasarım; Teleskopik sap; Suya dayanıklı dış yüzey; Hava koşullarına dayanıklı (sızdırmaz); Tekerlekler; Diğer
ro-RO: Caracteristicile husei: Bretele tip rucsac; Buzunar exterior pentru accesorii; Căptușeală din spumă rigidă; Separatoare interne; Care poate fi blocat; Etichetă cu nume/fereastră pentru ID; Interior căptușit; Colțuri ranforsate; Curea de umăr inclusă; Design stivuibil; Mâner telescopic; Exterior rezistent la apă; Rezistent la intemperii (etanș); Roți; Altele
es: Características del estuche: Correas de mochila; Bolsillo externo para accesorios; Revestimiento de espuma rígida; Divisores internos; Con cerradura; Etiqueta para el nombre/ventana de identificación; Interior acolchado; Esquinas reforzadas; Correa para el hombro incluida; Diseño apilable; Asa telescópica; Exterior resistente al agua; Resistente a la intemperie (sellado); Ruedas; Otro
fr: Caractéristiques du boîtier: Bretelles de sac à dos; Poche extérieure pour accessoires; Doublure en mousse rigide; Séparateurs internes; Verrouillable; Étiquette avec nom/fenêtre d’identification; Intérieur rembourré; Coins renforcés; Bandoulière incluse; Modèle empilable; Poignée télescopique; Extérieur résistant à l’eau; Résistant aux intempéries (scellé); Roulettes; Autre
hr-HR: Značajke kutije: Trake za nošenje kao ruksak; Vanjski džep za dodatke; Podstava od tvrde pjene; Unutarnje pregrade; S mogućnošću zaključavanja; Pločica s imenom / prozorčić za ID; Podstavljena unutrašnjost; Pojačani kutovi; Uključen remen za rame; Dizajn s mogućnošću slaganja; Teleskopska ručka; Vanjski dio otporan na vodu; Otporno na vremenske uvjete (zabrtvljeno); Kotačići; Ostalo
nb: Funksjoner i etui: Ryggsekkstropper; Utvendig tilbehørslomme; Fôr i hardt skum; Innvendige skillevegger; Låsbar; Navneskilt / ID-vindu; Polstret innside; Forsterkede hjørner; Skulderstropp inkludert; Design som kan stables; Teleskophåndtak; Vannavstøtende utside; Værbestandig (forseglet); Hjul; Annet
lt-LT: Dėklo ypatybės: Kuprinės dirželiai; Išorinė priedų kišenė; Kieto porolono pamušalas; Vidiniai skirtukai; Užrakinamas; Vardo etiketė / ID langelis; Paminkštintas vidus; Sustiprinti kampai; Su petneša; Sudedamas dizainas; Teleskopinė rankena; Vandeniui atspari išorė; Atsparus oro sąlygoms (sandarus); Ratukai; Kita
it: Funzionalità della cassa: Spallacci; Tasca esterna per accessori; Fodera in schiuma rigida; Divisori interni; Con serratura; Targhetta per il nome/Finestra per documento d'identità; Interno imbottito; Angoli rinforzati; Tracolla inclusa; Design impilabile; Manico telescopico; Esterno resistente all'acqua; Resistente alle intemperie (sigillato); Ruote; Altro
en: Case features: Backpack straps; External accessory pocket; Hard foam lining; Internal dividers; Lockable; Name tag/ID window; Padded interior; Reinforced corners; Shoulder strap included; Stackable design; Telescoping handle; Water-resistant exterior; Weatherproof (sealed); Wheels; Other
nl: Kenmerken koffer: Rugzakbanden; Extern accessoirevak; Voering van hard schuim; Interne verdelers; Afsluitbaar; Naamlabel/ID-venster; Gewatteerde binnenkant; Verstevigde hoeken; Inclusief schouderband; Stapelbaar ontwerp; Telescopische hendel; Waterbestendige buitenkant; Weerbestendig (geseald); Wielen; Overige
ru: Функции кейса: Лямки для рюкзака; Внешний карман для аксессуаров; Жесткая пенопластовая подкладка; Внутренние разделители; С замком; Бирка с именем/окошко для удостоверения; Мягкая обивка внутри; Усиленные углы; Плечевой ремень в комплекте; Штабелируемая конструкция; Телескопическая ручка; Влагозащитный внешний слой; Всепогодный (герметичный); Колеса; Другое
th: คุณสมบัติของเคส: สายสะพายหลัง; ช่องใส่อุปกรณ์เสริมด้านนอก; ซับในโฟมแข็ง; แผ่นกั้นภายใน; ล็อกได้; ช่องใส่ป้ายชื่อ/บัตร; บุนวมด้านใน; เสริมมุม; มีสายสะพายไหล่; ดีไซน์แบบวางซ้อนได้; ด้ามจับยืดหดได้; ภายนอกกันน้ำ; ทนสภาพอากาศ (ซีลปิด); ล้อ; อื่นๆ
da: Taskefunktioner: Rygsækstropper; Udvendig lomme til tilbehør; Hård skumforing; Indvendige rumdelere; Låsbar; Navneskilt/id-vindue; Polstret inderside; Forstærkede hjørner; Skulderstrop medfølger; Design, der kan stables; Teleskophåndtag; Vandafvisende yderside; Vejrbestandig (forseglet); Hjul; Andet
hu: Tok jellemzői: Hátizsákpántok; Külső kiegészítő zseb; Kemény habszivacs bélés; Belső elválasztók; Zárható; Névjegykártya-/azonosítóablak; Párnázott belső; Megerősített sarkok; Vállpánt mellékelve; Egymásra rakható kialakítás; Teleszkópos fogantyú; Vízálló külső; Időjárásálló (szigetelt); Kerekek; Egyéb
de: Merkmale der Kiste: Rucksackgurte; Externe Zubehörtasche; Hartschaumfutter; Interne Trennwände; Abschließbar; Namensschild/ID-Fenster; Gepolsterter Innenraum; Verstärkte Ecken; Inklusive Schultergurt; Stapelbares Design; Teleskopgriff; Wasserabweisende Außenseite; Wetterfest (versiegelt); Rollen; Sonstige
zh-TW: 外殼功能: 背包背帶; 外部配件口袋; 硬質泡棉內襯; 內部隔板; 可上鎖; 名牌/證件視窗; 鋪棉內裡; 加固邊角; 隨附肩帶; 可堆疊設計; 伸縮把手; 防潑水外層; 全天候防護 (密封); 滾輪; 其他
ko: 케이스 기능: 백팩 스트랩; 외부 액세서리 주머니; 하드 폼 안감; 내부 디바이더; 잠금 가능; 이름표/ID 창; 패딩 처리된 내부; 모서리 보강; 어깨 스트랩 포함; 적층형 디자인; 텔레스코픽 손잡이; 내수성 외장; 내후성(밀봉); 바퀴; 기타
pt-BR: Característicos do estojo: Alças de mochila; Bolso externo para acessórios; Forro de espuma rígida; Divisórias internas; Com trava; Etiqueta de nome/janela de identificação; Interior acolchoado; Cantos reforçados; Alça de ombro inclusa; Design empilhável; Alça telescópica; Exterior resistente à água; À prova de intempéries (vedado); Rodas; Outro
pl: Funkcje skrzynki: Paski jak do plecaka; Zewnętrzna kieszeń na akcesoria; Wyściółka z twardej pianki; Wewnętrzne przegrody; Zamykany na klucz; Okienko na identyfikator; Wyściełane wnętrze; Wzmocnione rogi; W zestawie pasek na ramię; Możliwość piętrowania; Teleskopowy uchwyt; Wodoodporna obudowa; Odporny na warunki atmosferyczne (uszczelniony); Kółka; Inne
sk-SK: Vlastnosti kufríka: Popruhy na batoh; Vonkajšie vrecko na príslušenstvo; Výstelka z tvrdej peny; Vnútorné prepážky; Uzamykateľné; Menovka/okienko na ID; Polstrované vnútro; Zosilnené rohy; Vrátane ramenného popruhu; Stohovateľný dizajn; Teleskopická rukoväť; Vodoodolný exteriér; Odolné voči poveternostným vplyvom (utesnené); Kolieska; Iné
ja: ケース機能: バックパックストラップ; 外部アクセサリーポケット; ハードフォームライニング; 内部仕切り; ロック可能; ネームタグ/IDウィンドウ; パッド入り内装; 補強コーナー; ショルダーストラップ付属; 積み重ね可能なデザイン; 伸縮式ハンドル; 耐水性外装; 耐候性 (密閉); ホイール; その他
bg-BG: Характеристики на калъфа: Презрамки за раница; Външен джоб за аксесоари; Твърда подплата от пяна; Вътрешни разделители; Заключващ се; Етикет с име/прозорче за ID; Подплатена вътрешност; Подсилени ъгли; Включена презрамка; Дизайн за подреждане един върху друг; Телескопична дръжка; Водоустойчива външна част; Устойчив на атмосферни влияния (запечатан); Колела; Друго
vi: Tính năng của hộp đựng: Quai đeo ba lô; Túi đựng phụ kiện bên ngoài; Lớp lót xốp cứng; Vách ngăn bên trong; Có thể khóa; Thẻ tên/Cửa sổ ID; Nội thất có đệm; Góc được gia cố; Kèm dây đeo vai; Thiết kế có thể xếp chồng; Tay cầm kéo dài; Mặt ngoài chống nước; Chống thời tiết (kín); Bánh xe; Khác
pt-PT: Características do estojo: Alças de mochila; Bolso exterior para acessórios; Forro de espuma dura; Divisórias interiores; Com fecho; Etiqueta/janela para identificação; Interior almofadado; Cantos reforçados; Alça de ombro incluída; Design empilhável; Pega telescópica; Exterior resistente à água; À prova de intempéries (selado); Rodas; Outro
sl-SI: Lastnosti etuija: Naramnice kot pri nahrbtniku; Zunanji žep za dodatke; Podloga iz trde pene; Notranji razdelilniki; Z možnostjo zaklepanja; Obesezek za ime/okno za ID; Podložena notranjost; Ojačani vogali; Vključen ramenski trak; Zasnova, ki omogoča nalaganje; Teleskopski ročaj; Vodoodporna zunanjost; Odporno proti vremenskim vplivom (zatesnjeno); Kolesa; Drugo
fi: Kotelon ominaisuudet: Reppuolkaimet; Ulkoinen tarviketasku; Kova vaahtomuovivuori; Sisäiset jakajat; Lukittava; Nimilappu-/henkilökortti-ikkuna; Pehmustettu sisäosa; Vahvistetut kulmat; Sisältää olkahihnan; Pinottava muotoilu; Teleskooppikahva; Vedenkestävä ulkopinta; Säänkestävä (tiivistetty); Pyörät; Muu
sv: Detaljer för fodral: Ryggsäcksremmar; Utvändigt tillbehörsfack; Hårt skumfoder; Invändiga avdelare; Låsbar; Namnlapp/ID-fönster; Vadderad insida; Förstärkta hörn; Axelrem ingår; Stapelbar design; Teleskophandtag; Vattenavvisande utsida; Väderbeständig (förseglad); Hjul; Annat
zh-CN: 箱包特点: 双肩包背带; 外部配件口袋; 硬质泡沫内衬; 内部隔板; 可上锁; 姓名牌/ID 窗口; 软垫内饰; 加固边角; 含肩带; 可堆叠设计; 伸缩拉杆; 防泼水外壳; 防风雨（密封）; 滚轮; 其他
el: Χαρακτηριστικά θήκης: Ιμάντες πλάτης; Εξωτερική τσέπη αξεσουάρ; Επένδυση από σκληρό αφρό; Εσωτερικά διαχωριστικά; Με δυνατότητα κλειδώματος; Ετικέτα ονόματος/θυρίδα ταυτότητας; Εσωτερικό με επένδυση; Ενισχυμένες γωνίες; Περιλαμβάνεται ιμάντας ώμου; Σχεδιασμός για στοίβαξη; Τηλεσκοπική λαβή; Ανθεκτικό στο νερό εξωτερικό; Ανθεκτικό στις καιρικές συνθήκες (σφραγισμένο); Ρόδες; Άλλο
cs: Vlastnosti pouzdra: Popruhy na batoh; Vnější kapsa na příslušenství; Výstelka z tvrdé pěny; Vnitřní přepážky; Uzamykatelné; Jmenovka / okénko na ID; Polstrovaný vnitřek; Vyztužené rohy; Včetně ramenního popruhu; Stohovatelný design; Teleskopická rukojeť; Voděodolný zevnějšek; Odolné proti povětrnostním vlivům (utěsněné); Kolečka; Jiné